Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1611
Nebraska Energy Code; adoption; alternative standards; used; when.

The Legislature hereby adopts the 2018 International Energy Conservation Code published by the International Code Council as the Nebraska Energy Code. The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment may adopt regulations specifying alternative standards for building systems, techniques, equipment designs, or building materials that shall be deemed equivalent to the Nebraska Energy Code. Regulations specifying alternative standards may be deemed equivalent to the Nebraska Energy Code and may be approved for general or limited use if the use of such alternative standards would not result in energy consumption greater than would result from the strict application of the Nebraska Energy Code.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 35;

Laws 1983, LB 124, § 12;

Laws 2000, LB 1135, § 26;

Laws 2004, LB 888, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB329, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 159;

Laws 2019, LB405, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 453.